Windows-l10n-central/da/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/da.dic
Alikka/55
amu-center/70,118,85,976
aneroidbarometer/70,118,85,976
Anne-Jette/55
annotering/70,73,7,976
antifascist/70,73,7,976
appelsinskræl/46,70,976
aprilsnar/130,70,976
Atli/55
balletmester/115,70,85,976
behandlingscenter/70,118,85,976
bemærkelse/70,73,7,976
benediktinerkloster/70,118,85,976
beneficeforestilling/70,73,7,976
Berend/55
beslutningsproces/46,70,976
Bolius/55
bowlingcenter/70,118,85,976
brandgod/70,962,366
bravurnummer/70,85,10,976
brudurt/70,73,7,976
budgetkontrol/46,70,976
bygmester/115,70,85,976
Bøget/699,55
center/70,118,85,976,941,947
ceremonimester/115,70,85,976
computergrafik/737,70,976
dedikation/70,73,7,976,939,947
Derrik/55
detailbutik/46,70,976
drivanker/70,118,85,976
drivfjeder/115,70,85,976
dupering/70,73,7,976
egenpension/70,73,7,976
ejendomsskat/46,70,976
eksperimentalteater/70,118,85,976
Enderup/699,55
epicenter/70,118,85,976
evangelist/70,73,7,976
fagminister/115,70,85,976
festivalgæst/70,73,7,976
filetfabrik/46,70,976
filter/70,84,10,976,941,947
fiskeriminister/115,70,85,976
fjeder/115,70,85,976,941,947
fnatmide/70,73,7,976
forskningscenter/70,118,85,976
forsvarspolitik/46,70,976
forsænkning/70,73,7,976
foster/70,118,85,976,941,947
freudianisme/193,70,976
Fridbjørg/55
fyr/130,70,976
førstemester/115,70,85,976
gaskammer/70,85,10,976,941,947
gasometer/70,118,85,976
gennembrydning/70,73,7,976
gigtsanatorium/70,976
glug/46,70,976
Gülsah/55
handelscenter/70,118,85,976
handelsminister/115,70,85,976
handlemønster/70,118,85,976
hattedame/70,73,7,976
havmiljø/70,10,73,976
hieroglyf/46,70,976
Holden/55
hornorkester/70,118,85,976
husalter/70,118,85,976
hæftning/70,73,7,976
håndværksmester/115,70,85,976
ikkeindblanding/70,73,7,976
indføringshylster/70,118,85,976
influenzavirus/46,70,976
ishav/10,70,20,976,939,947
Janeck/55
jerngitter/70,85,10,976,941,947
kabaretteater/70,118,85,976
kagekone/70,73,7,976
kapelmester/115,70,85,976
kapitallogik/46,70,976
katalognummer/70,85,10,976
Katie/55
klanmedlem/70,9,976
kommuneskat/46,70,976
kondensation/70,73,7,976,939,947
konferencecenter/70,118,85,976
konfirmationsalder/115,70,85,976
kredsmandat/70,10,73,976
kulak/46,70,976
kulturcenter/70,118,85,976
kursuscenter/70,118,85,976
Kvejnbjerg/699,55
københavnsmester/115,70,85,976
kølevandspumpe/70,73,7,976
langskaftet/70,1062
lillefinger/115,70,85,976
livsmønster/70,118,85,976
logaritmetabel/46,70,976
Louize/55
lægeplante/70,73,7,976
læremester/115,70,85,976
lærling/20,7,70,976,940,947
maskinmester/115,70,85,976
Mateo/55
mediecenter/70,118,85,976
meditationsteknik/46,70,976
mikrokefal/913,70,366,976
mindelegat/70,10,73,976
mineraluldsfiber/115,70,85,976
multimeter/70,118,85,976
murermester/115,70,85,976
muskatnød/46,70,976
Mårten/55
nar/130,70,976,449,947
nattetom/1106,70,366
nethinde/70,73,7,976
Odderup/699,55
ohmmeter/70,118,85,976
overborgmester/115,70,85,976
overdækning/70,73,7,976
overlap/46,70,976
pasnummer/70,85,10,976
paternoster/70,118,85,976
perimeter/115,70,85,976
personoplysning/70,73,7,976
pirog/46,70,976
polster/70,118,85,976
porøsitet/70,73,7,976
pubertetsalder/115,70,85,976
pullimut/46,70,976
pulterkammer/70,85,10,976
Ravnsnæs/699,55
reklamemedie/70,10,73,976
rockerklub/46,70,976
rygepolitik/46,70,976
Salomonøer/55
sandmusling/70,73,7,976
shoppingcenter/70,118,85,976
skak/46,70,976
skatkammer/70,85,10,976,941,947
skatmester/115,70,85,976
Skodbjerge/699,55
skuemester/115,70,85,976
skærmplante/70,73,7,976
slacks/70,976
snob/46,70,976,941,947
spektrometer/70,118,85,976
spiralfjeder/115,70,85,976
statsskole/70,73,7,976
stedsøn/46,70,976
stjernemønster/70,118,85,976
stormester/115,70,85,976
subjekt/70,10,73,976,941,947
Svava/55
sømandskasket/46,70,976
tagkammer/70,85,10,976
Tjalfe/55
tommeltot/46,70,976
totrinsløsning/70,73,7,976
trafikminister/115,70,85,976
traumecenter/70,118,85,976
tropenat/70,976
udenrigsminister/115,70,85,976,941,947
udviklingsminister/115,70,85,976
umulius/46,70,976
Vejrholt/699,55
venneanmodning/70,73,7,976
viceborgmester/115,70,85,976
V-motor/70,73,7,976
wattmeter/70,118,85,976
ynglingealder/115,70,85,976
Yaasiin/55
